Illinois, session 104th, HB5083.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Faith-Based Housing and Mixed-Use By-Right Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose.7    (a) The General Assembly finds that:8        (1) Illinois faces persistent shortages of housing 9    across income levels, including supportive housing.10        (2) Faith-based and religious institutions often own 11    or steward land that can be responsibly developed to meet 12    housing needs.13        (3) Discretionary, subjective, or politically 14    contingent land use approvals can create unreasonable 15    barriers to timely housing production.16    (b) The purpose of this Act is to establish a uniform 17statewide, ministerial, by-right entitlement for multifamily 18and mixed-use housing on qualifying faith-based land, while 19preserving generally applicable health and safety regulation. 20    Section 10. Applicability.21    (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), this Act applies 22to all faith-based land within this State.  HB5083- 2 -LRB104 18341 RTM 31781 b1    (b) This Act does not apply to faith-based land that is 2located within one-quarter mile of:3        (1) a heavy industrial use; or4        (2) an airport with scheduled commercial service, a 5    public-use seaport, or an active military installation.6    (c) A unit of local government bears the burden of 7demonstrating the applicability of subsection (b) based on 8substantial evidence in a written determination issued within 9the time periods in Section 40. 10    Section 15. Definitions. As used in this Act:11    "By-right" means a use and development that is permitted 12without any discretionary zoning or land use approval, and 13that may be approved only through ministerial review for 14compliance with objective standards and generally applicable 15codes.16    "Discretionary approval" includes, without limitation, a 17zoning map amendment, planned development, special use, 18conditional use, variation, special exception, text amendment 19required solely to enable the use, comprehensive plan 20amendment, development agreement required solely to enable the 21use, or any similar discretionary land use classification or 22entitlement.23    "Faith-based land" means real property in this State that 24is:25        (1) owned in fee simple by a faith-based organization;   HB5083- 3 -LRB104 18341 RTM 31781 b1    or2        (2) held of record in fee by trustees for the use or 3    benefit of a faith-based organization, religious 4    congregation, or religious corporation; or5        (3) leased by a faith-based organization under a 6    recorded lease, with a remaining or initial term of not 7    less than 30 years.8    "Faith-based organization" means:9        (1) a religious corporation;10        (2) a religious congregation; and11        (3) any nonprofit corporation, not-for-profit 12    corporation, or other nonprofit entity that is tax-exempt 13    under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and 14    is controlled by, affiliated with, or acting at the 15    direction of an entity described in paragraph (1) or (2) 16    for religious, charitable, or community-service purposes.17    "Generally applicable code" means a building, fire, 18life-safety, electrical, plumbing, mechanical, energy, 19accessibility, stormwater, floodplain, health, or similar 20code, ordinance, or regulation that:21        (1) applies broadly to the jurisdiction or to a zoning 22    district or overlay without regard to the identity of the 23    landowner or the religious status of the property;24        (2) is not applied in a manner that imposes 25    requirements on a development authorized by this Act that 26    are more burdensome than those imposed on comparable   HB5083- 4 -LRB104 18341 RTM 31781 b1    developments; and2        (3) does not include any discretionary approval 3    process, subjective design guideline, or standard whose 4    satisfaction is determined by a board, commission, 5    council, or other discretionary body.6    "Gross floor area" or "building gross floor area" means 7the sum of the gross horizontal area of all floors of all 8buildings and enclosed structures in a development, measured 9from the exterior faces of the exterior walls or from the 10centerline of walls separating two buildings, including 11mezzanines and enclosed porches, and including below-grade or 12partially below-grade floors, but excluding roof area open to 13the sky and excluding floor area devoted solely to accessory 14parking and required loading and the circulation areas serving 15such parking and loading.16    "Group home" means a residential facility providing 17housing and support services in a community-based environment 18for individuals requiring assistance due to physical, mental, 19developmental, or behavioral disabilities.20    "Heavy industrial use" means a storage, processing, or 21manufacturing use:22        (1) with processes using flammable or explosive 23    materials in a manner that triggers special hazard 24    occupancy classifications under generally adopted building 25    or fire codes;26        (2) involving hazardous conditions regulated under   HB5083- 5 -LRB104 18341 RTM 31781 b1    federal or State environmental law; or2        (3) that is noxious or offensive from odors, smoke, 3    noise, fumes, or vibrations such that it is commonly 4    separated from residential uses in local zoning practice.5    "Ministerial review" means a review limited to confirming 6compliance with objective standards and generally applicable 7codes, without discretion to deny, condition, or delay a 8development based on subjective criteria, public opposition, 9or policy considerations outside those standards and codes.10    "Mixed-use" means use and development of a site consisting 11of residential and nonresidential uses in which residential 12uses occupy at least 60% of the total building gross floor area 13of the development.14    "Multifamily" means development of a site for 3 or more 15dwelling units within one or more buildings, including a 16residential condominium.17    "Objective standard" means a standard that:18        (1) is stated in fixed, measurable, or otherwise 19    ascertainable terms in the text of an ordinance, code, or 20    adopted engineering manual;21        (2) is capable of being applied and determined without 22    the exercise of personal, subjective, or aesthetic 23    judgment by a public official or body; and24        (3) is uniformly applicable to similarly situated 25    development within the jurisdiction.26    "Religious corporation" means a corporation formed for   HB5083- 6 -LRB104 18341 RTM 31781 b1religious purposes under the Religious Corporation Act, 2including a church, congregation, or society incorporated 3under that Act.4    "Religious congregation" means any church, congregation, 5or society formed for the purposes of religious worship, 6whether or not incorporated.7    "Supportive housing" means residential accommodations 8combined with on-site or off-site supportive services designed 9to assist individuals or families in maintaining stable 10housing and achieving greater independence.11    "Trustees" includes trustees, wardens, vestrymen, or other 12officers performing duties similar to trustees for a religious 13congregation or religious corporation. 14    Section 20. Proof of qualifying status; nondiscrimination. 15    (a) A faith-based organization may demonstrate qualifying 16status by submitting any of the following:17        (1) a recorded affidavit of incorporation or certified 18    copy thereof for a religious corporation formed under the 19    Religious Corporation Act;20        (2) articles of incorporation, an IRS determination 21    letter, or other documentation establishing tax-exempt 22    status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 23    Code as a religious or charitable organization;24        (3) a recorded deed, trust, or other instrument 25    showing ownership or holding of title by trustees for the   HB5083- 7 -LRB104 18341 RTM 31781 b1    use or benefit of a religious congregation or religious 2    corporation; or3        (4) other objective documentation reasonably 4    sufficient to establish that the applicant is a 5    faith-based organization.6    (b) A unit of local government shall not condition 7approval on the faith-based organization's denomination, 8theology, mode of worship, or other religious doctrine, and 9shall apply this Act in a religion-neutral manner. 10    Section 25. Allowable uses; by-right entitlement.11    (a) A unit of local government shall permit the following 12as allowable by-right uses on faith-based land:13        (1) multifamily development; and14        (2) mixed-use development.15    (b) A unit of local government may not require a proposed 16multifamily or mixed-use development on faith-based land to 17obtain any discretionary approval in order to:18        (1) permit the proposed use and development; or19        (2) allow for the minimum development standards and 20    limitations established by this Act.21    (c) The by-right entitlement under this Act applies 22whether or not the faith-based organization continues to 23operate an existing religious, educational, or community 24facility on the same parcel or adjacent parcel, and regardless 25of whether the housing is owned, leased, operated, or   HB5083- 8 -LRB104 18341 RTM 31781 b1developed by the faith-based organization or by a partner 2acting under agreement with the faith-based organization. 3    Section 30. Prohibited local requirements and constraints. 4For a multifamily or mixed-use development on faith-based 5land, a unit of local government may not:6        (1) restrict the height of the proposed development to 7    less than 60 feet or 5 full stories, whichever permits a 8    greater height, except to the extent a lower height is 9    required to comply with a generally applicable airport 10    safety overlay required by federal law;11        (2) require setbacks in excess of 10 feet from the 12    front of the building, 10 feet from the rear of the 13    building, and 5 feet from the side of the building, except 14    as required to satisfy generally applicable fire access 15    standards or building code light or ventilation 16    requirements;17        (3) establish or enforce any minimum off-street 18    parking requirement for dwelling units or nonresidential 19    uses, except as necessary to comply with:20            (A) the Americans with Disabilities Act and 21        implementing regulations; or22            (B) other federal law that expressly requires 23        minimum parking;24        (4) restrict development through maximum or minimum 25    density caps, floor-area ratio, lot coverage, minimum unit   HB5083- 9 -LRB104 18341 RTM 31781 b1    size, maximum unit size, maximum number of bedrooms, or 2    any other dimensional or quantitative constraint, except 3    as expressly permitted in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this 4    Section and except for generally applicable codes and 5    structural safety limits;6        (5) prohibit or unreasonably restrict supportive 7    housing or group homes within a multifamily or mixed-use 8    development authorized by this Act;9        (6) require the conversion to exceed standards imposed 10    by the generally adopted building code for a change of 11    occupancy for a proposed development converting an 12    existing building from a different use to a multifamily 13    use or mixed-use use, provided that this paragraph does 14    not limit generally applicable accessibility requirements;15        (7) require review or approval based on subjective 16    standards including, without limitation, neighborhood 17    character, compatibility, aesthetic harmony, community 18    fit, or similar criteria, or require appearance-based 19    design approvals by a board, commission, council, or other 20    discretionary body as a condition of approval; or21        (8) require a public hearing, vote of the corporate 22    authorities, plan commission recommendation, zoning board 23    recommendation, aldermanic prerogative sign-off, or any 24    other legislative or quasi-judicial proceeding as a 25    condition of approving the use or development authorized 26    by this Act.   HB5083- 10 -LRB104 18341 RTM 31781 b1    Section 35. Permitted local regulation; objective 2standards preserved.3    (a) Nothing in this Act affects the authority of a unit of 4local government to apply to a development authorized by this 5Act requirements that are:6        (1) generally applicable to comparable developments 7    within the jurisdiction;8        (2) objective and ascertainable on the face of the 9    ordinance or code provision; and10        (3) related to public health and safety.11    (b) Permitted regulations include, without limitation:12        (1) building codes, fire codes, and life-safety codes 13    of general applicability;14        (2) generally applicable accessibility requirements;15        (3) sewer, water, and utility connection requirements;16        (4) stormwater and floodplain management requirements;17        (5) environmental remediation requirements imposed by 18    State or federal law;19        (6) construction-phase requirements of general 20    applicability including erosion control, dust control, and 21    hours that do not function as a denial of the by-right 22    entitlement.23    (c) A unit of local government may impose ministerial 24permit fees that do not exceed the ministerial permit fees 25imposed on comparable multifamily or mixed-use developments.   HB5083- 11 -LRB104 18341 RTM 31781 b1However, a unit of local government may not condition approval 2on an exaction, dedication, impact fee, or contribution that 3is not also generally imposed on comparable developments, and 4any such condition shall be subject to generally applicable 5constitutional standards. 6    Section 40. Duty to approve; ministerial review; 7timelines; deemed approval.8    (a) A unit of local government shall approve an 9application for a multifamily or mixed-use development on 10faith-based land if the development satisfies the unit of 11local government's generally applicable, objective land 12development and building regulations as limited by this Act.13    (b) The duty to approve under subsection (a) is 14ministerial.15    (c) Within 15 business days after submission, the unit of 16local government shall notify the applicant in writing of any 17specific, objective information required to deem the 18application complete. If the unit of local government fails to 19comply with this subsection, then the application shall be 20deemed complete.21    (d) Within 60 days after an application is deemed 22complete, the unit of local government shall approve or deny 23the application in a written determination. A denial must 24identify each specific, objective provision of a generally 25applicable code or ordinance with which the application fails   HB5083- 12 -LRB104 18341 RTM 31781 b1to comply, and shall describe the corrective action that would 2result in compliance. If the unit of local government fails to 3approve or deny an application within the time period required 4by this subsection, then the application shall be deemed 5approved by operation of law.6    (e) Upon deemed approval, the applicant may request, and 7the unit of local government shall issue within 10 business 8days, all permits necessary to commence construction, subject 9only to compliance with generally applicable building and 10safety codes. 11    Section 45. Enforcement; remedies; fees; waiver of 12immunity; expedited hearing.13    (a) Any of the following may bring an action to enforce 14this Act:15        (1) a faith-based organization that owns, leases, or 16    is developing faith-based land;17        (2) an applicant or developer acting under agreement 18    with a faith-based organization;19        (3) any person directly aggrieved by a violation of 20    this Act, including by unlawful denial, unlawful delay, or 21    imposition of prohibited requirements.22    (b) An action under this Section shall be brought in the 23circuit court of the county in which the property is wholly or 24partly located.25    (c) In an action under this Section, the court may:  HB5083- 13 -LRB104 18341 RTM 31781 b1        (1) enter declaratory judgment;2        (2) issue a writ of mandamus compelling compliance 3    with this Act;4        (3) issue temporary, preliminary, or permanent 5    injunctive relief;6        (4) order issuance of permits wrongfully withheld;7        (5) award damages for proven economic losses 8    proximately caused by the violation, including carrying 9    costs and increased construction costs attributable to 10    unlawful delay.11    (d) The court shall award reasonable attorney's fees and 12court costs to a prevailing plaintiff.13    (e) Any statutory, common law, or governmental immunity of 14a unit of local government is waived to the extent necessary to 15effectuate the remedies expressly authorized by this Section, 16including damages authorized under paragraph (5) of subsection 17(c).18    (f) The circuit court shall prioritize actions under this 19Act and, upon motion of any party, shall set a hearing on 20preliminary relief as soon as practicable. 21    Section 50. Home rule.     A home rule municipality may 22not regulate faith-based land in a manner inconsistent with 23this Act. This Act is a limitation under subsection (i) of 24Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 25concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions   HB5083- 14 -LRB104 18341 RTM 31781 b1exercised by the State. 2    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 3severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.